Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-403
Eligibility to register as online notary public; qualifications.

(1) To be eligible to register as an online notary public, a person shall:

(a) Hold a valid commission as a notary public in the State of Nebraska;

(b) Satisfy the education requirement of section 64-404; and

(c) Pay the fee required under section 64-405.

(2) The Secretary of State shall not accept the registration if the requirements of subsection (1) of this section are not met.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 3.